District of Columbia statutes.
47-3709

Repealed

Testimony; production of books and records.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 10, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(zz)(2), 48 DCR 334
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”
1981 Ed., § 47-3709.